Georgia statutes. TITLE 18 Debtor and Creditor
Article 1 General Provisions

18-2-1.
Creation of relationship of debtor and creditor.

Whenever one person, by contract or by law, is liable and bound to pay to another an amount of money, certain or uncertain, the relation of debtor and creditor exists between them.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1946; Code 1868, § 1934; Code 1873, § 1944; Code 1882, § 1944; Civil Code 1895, § 2686; Civil Code 1910, § 3215; Code 1933, § 28-101.

18-2-2.
Compulsory election of remedy least likely to jeopardize rights of other creditors.

As among themselves, creditors shall so prosecute their own rights as not to jeopardize unnecessarily the rights of others; hence, a creditor having a lien on two funds of the debtor, equally accessible to him, will be compelled to pursue the one on which other creditors have no lien.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1951; Code 1868, § 1939; Code 1873, § 1949; Code 1882, § 1949; Civil Code 1895, § 2691; Civil Code 1910, § 3220; Code 1933, § 28-106.

18-2-3.
Reaching of equitable assets by creditors.

Courts of equity jurisdiction shall assist creditors in reaching equitable assets in every case where to refuse interference would jeopardize the collection of their debts.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1948; Code 1868, § 1936; Code 1873, § 1946; Code 1882, § 1946; Civil Code 1895, § 2688; Civil Code 1910, § 3217; Code 1933, § 28-103.

Law reviews.

For article, “Retirement Benefits: Protection from Creditors’ Claims,” see 24 Ga. St. B.J. 118 (1988).